Rhode Island, session 2025, HB6363.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 44-5 of the General Laws entitled "Levy and Assessment of Local
Taxes" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
44-5-11.19. Tax classification - Tiverton.
(a) The assessor of the town of Tiverton shall annually prepare a list containing the full and
fair valuation of each property within the town and the percentage of the tax levy to be apportioned
to each class of property and tax rates sufficient to produce the proportion of the total tax levy.
(b) The assessor has the authority to apply different rates of taxation against all classes of
property to determine the tax due and payable on the property; provided that, the rate of taxation is
uniform within each class.
(c) Classes of property.
(1) Class 1: Residential real estate consisting of not more than five (5) dwelling units; land
classified as open space; and dwellings on leased land.
(i) A homestead exemption provision is also authorized within this class.
(ii) In lieu of a homestead exemption, the town of Tiverton may divide this class into non-
owner and owner-occupied property and adopt separate tax rates in compliance with the within tax
rate restrictions.
(2) Class 2: Commercial and industrial real estate; residential properties containing partial
commercial or business uses; and residential real estate of more than five (5) dwelling units.
(3) Class 3: All ratable, tangible personal property.

(4) Class 4: Motor vehicles and trailers subject to the excise tax created by chapter 34 of
this title (repealed).
(5) Class 5: Mobile homes on leased land, which shall be subject to tax at the applicable
state rate.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC002969
========
LC002969 - Page 2 of 3